Maryland, session 2025, SB0697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
20–507.
(I) A REDUCTION IN A PREMIUM PROVIDED BY THE FUND TO AN INSURED
SHALL BE:
(1) BASED ON THE INCOME OF THE INSURED; AND
(2) ACTUARIALLY JUSTIFIED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0697*